Arkansas, session 2025, HB1584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Timeframe for eligibility determination for home- and
community-based services — Independent assessments for home- and community-
based services.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall ensure eligibility
determination, approval, and authorization of a beneficiary for home- and
community-based services within a waiver under § 1915(c) of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., are completed within thirty (30) days
of the initial application.
(b) If the program contracts with a third party to perform an
independent assessment of a beneficiary for home- and community-based
services, the third party shall complete the independent assessment within
*JMB204*
02/24/2025 4:38:18 PM JMB204

HB1584
thirty (30) days of the initial application under subsection (a) of this
section.
(c) The Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Implement an abbreviated independent assessment process for
beneficiaries who have previously been approved for home- and community-based
services through an independent assessment, including without limitation a
desk review, for beneficiaries who receive home- and community-based services
within a waiver under § 1915(c) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396
et seq.; and
(2) Apply for any federal waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment,
or other authorization necessary to implement this section.

























02/24/2025 4:38:18 PM JMB204